Hawaii statutes.
[§571-55] Certification in lieu of oath.
Whenever any testimony, declaration, deposition, certification or pleading in
the family court is required or authorized to be on oath or affirmation, the
person so required or authorized may testify, declare, depose, certify, or
plead under "penalty of perjury" in such form as may be prescribed by
the court. [L 1970, c 17, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next